Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Article 9. General Provisions.
Sec. 23.20.526.
Exclusions from definition of “employment”.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, “employment” does not include

domestic service in a private home, except as provided in AS

23.20.525(a)(13)

;

newsboys’ services in selling or distributing newspapers on the street or from house to house;

service not in the course of the employing unit’s trade or business performed in a calendar quarter by an individual, unless the cash remuneration paid for the service is $50 or more and the service is performed by an individual who is regularly employed by the employing unit to perform the service; an individual is here considered to be regularly employed to perform service not in the course of an employing unit’s trade or business during a calendar quarter only if the individual performs the service for some portion of the day on each of 24 days during the quarter or during the preceding calendar quarter;

service performed by an individual in the employ of the individual’s

son, daughter, or spouse;

parent or legal guardian if the individual was under the age of 21 years and a full-time student during eight of the last 12 months and intends to resume full-time student status within the next four months; and

mother or father if the service is performed by a child under the age of 18;

service with respect to which unemployment insurance is payable under an unemployment insurance program established by an Act of Congress;

service performed in the employ of a foreign government including service as a consular or other officer or employee or a nondiplomatic representative;

service performed in the employ of an instrumentality wholly owned by a foreign government if

the service is of a character similar to that performed in foreign countries by employees of the United States government or its instrumentalities; and

the department finds that the United States Secretary of State has certified to the United States Secretary of the Treasury that the foreign government, with respect to whose instrumentality exemption is claimed, grants an equivalent exemption with respect to similar service performed in the foreign country by employees of the United States government and its instrumentalities;

service performed by an insurance agent, insurance solicitor, real estate broker, real estate salesperson, or securities salesperson to the extent the person is compensated by commission, unless the service is required to be covered under the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended;

notwithstanding AS

23.20.525(a)(9)

, service performed by an officer or member of the crew of an American vessel on or in connection with the vessel, if the operating office, from which the operations of the vessel operating on navigable waters inside or inside and outside the United States are ordinarily and regularly supervised, managed, directed, and controlled, is outside this state;

service performed on or in connection with a vessel not an American vessel by an individual if the individual performed service on and in connection with the vessel when outside the United States;

service performed in the employ of the United States government or an instrumentality of the United States exempt under the Constitution of the United States from the contributions imposed by this chapter, except that to the extent that the Congress of the United States permits states to require an instrumentality of the United States to make payments into an unemployment fund under a state employment security law, all of the provisions of this chapter apply to the instrumentalities, and to service performed for the instrumentalities in the same manner, to the same extent, and on the same terms as to all other employers, employing units, individuals, and service; however, if this state is not certified for any year by the United States Secretary of Labor under 26 U.S.C. 3304(c) (Federal Unemployment Tax Act, Internal Revenue Code), the payments required of the instrumentalities with respect to the year shall be refunded by the department from the fund in the same manner and within the same period as is provided in AS

23.20.225

with respect to contributions erroneously collected;

service performed in the employ of another state, or political subdivision of another state, or an instrumentality of another state or political subdivision that is wholly owned by another state or its political subdivision, or a service performed in the employ of an instrumentality of another state or its political subdivisions to the extent that the instrumentality is, with respect to the service, exempt under the Constitution of the United States from the tax imposed by 26 U.S.C. 3301 (Federal Unemployment Tax Act, Internal Revenue Code);

service performed in the employ of an international organization;

service covered by an election approved by the agency charged with the administration of any other state or federal employment security law, in accordance with an arrangement under AS

23.20.090(a)

during the effective period of the election;

service performed by an individual in agricultural labor, except as provided in AS

23.20.525(a)(14)

; the term “agricultural labor” means remunerated service

on a farm, in the employ of any person in connection with cultivating the soil, or in connection with raising or harvesting any agricultural or horticultural commodity, including the raising, shearing, feeding, caring for, training, and management of livestock, bees, poultry, and fur-bearing animals and wildlife;

in the employ of the owner or tenant or other operator of a farm, in connection with the operation, management, conservation, improvement, or maintenance of the farm and its tools and equipment, or in salvaging timber or clearing land of brush and other debris left by a hurricane, if the major part of the service is performed on a farm;

in connection with the production or harvesting of any commodity defined as an agricultural commodity in 12 U.S.C. 1141j (Sec. 15(g), Agricultural Marketing Act), as amended, or in connection with the operation or maintenance of ditches, canals, reservoirs, or waterways, not owned or operated for profit, used exclusively for supplying and storing water for farming purposes;

in the employ of the operator of a farm in handling, planting, drying, packing, packaging, processing, freezing, grading, storing, or delivering to storage or to market or to a carrier for transportation to market, in its unmanufactured state, any agricultural or horticultural commodity; but only if the operator produced more than one-half of the commodity with respect to which the service is performed except as stated in (b) of this section;

in the employ of a group of operators of farms, or a cooperative organization of which the operators are members, in the performance of service described in (D) of this paragraph, but only if the operators produced more than one-half of the commodity with respect to which the service is performed;

on a farm operated for profit if the service is not in the course of the employer’s trade or business;

service performed as a student nurse in the employ of a hospital or a nurses’ training school by an individual who is enrolled and is regularly attending classes in a nurses’ training school chartered or approved in accordance with the laws of this state, and service performed as an intern in the employ of a hospital by an individual who has completed a four-year course in a medical school chartered or approved in accordance with the laws of this state, unless the service is required to be covered under the Federal Unemployment Tax Act;

service performed by an individual on a boat engaged in catching fish or other forms of aquatic animal life under an arrangement with the owner or operator of that boat under which

that individual does not receive any cash remuneration except as provided in (B) of this paragraph;

that individual receives a share of the boat’s, or the boats’ in the case of a fishing operation involving more than one boat, catch of fish or other forms of aquatic animal life or a share of the proceeds from the sale of that catch; and

the amount of that individual’s share depends on the amount of the boat’s, or the boats’ in the case of a fishing operation involving more than one boat, catch of fish or other forms of aquatic animal life; but only if the operating crew of that boat, or each boat from which the individual receives a share in the case of a fishing operation involving more than one boat, is normally made up of fewer than 10 individuals;

service performed as a prospective or impaneled juror in a court;

service performed for a corporation by an employee of the corporation if

the corporation is incorporated under AS 10.06;

the corporation is not a government corporation; and

the employee is an executive officer of the corporation;

service performed by an individual who drives a taxicab whose compensation and written contractual arrangements are as described in AS

23.10.055(a)(13)

;

service of an individual who

directly sells or solicits the sale of consumer products, for resale or otherwise, personally to a prospective consumer in the home or otherwise than in a permanent retail establishment; a sale or solicitation by telephone, mail, other telecommunications method, or other nonpersonal method does not satisfy the requirement of this subparagraph;

is compensated solely by

commissions on sales or other remuneration directly related to sales or sales performance; or

a profit represented by the difference between the wholesale cost of the product to the seller and the final sale price to the consumer; and

performs under a written contract with the person for whom the service is performed that provides, notwithstanding AS

23.20.395(a)

, that the individual is not an employee for purposes of this chapter or for federal or state tax purposes;

temporary services related to emergency oil spill training and response activities by an individual described in (17) of this subsection; in this paragraph, “temporary” means a period of less than seven continuous days; and

volunteer work performed by a person engaged on a contract basis as a sports official at a sports event for which the competitors are not paid a wage or salary; however, the exemption provided under this paragraph does not apply to a claim for benefits under this chapter that is related to a sports event or competition sponsored by an employer for whom the person making the claim normally performs work, including work as a teacher, coach, or administrator, that is not sports official work; in this paragraph,

“sports official” is a participant in a sports event or competition whose participation is neutral with respect to who wins or loses, including an umpire, referee, judge, scorekeeper, timekeeper, or organizer;

“volunteer work” means work for which compensation does not exceed $1,500 a year and is paid only to defray or reimburse the reasonable food, travel, and incidental expenses the person incurs in order to perform the work or as a result of performing the work.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the provisions of (a)(15)(D) and (E) of this section are not applicable to service performed in connection with commercial canning or commercial freezing or in connection with any agricultural or horticultural commodity after its delivery to a terminal market for distribution for consumption.

In (a)(15) of this section, “farm” includes stock, dairy, poultry, fruit, fur-bearing animal, and truck farms, plantations, ranches, nurseries, ranges, greenhouses or other similar structures used primarily for the raising of agricultural or horticultural commodities, and orchards.

For the purposes of AS

23.20.525(a)(4)

and (12), the term “employment” does not apply to service performed

by a duly ordained, commissioned, or licensed minister of a church in the exercise of the person’s ministry or by a member of a religious order in the exercise of duties required by the order;

in a facility conducted for the purpose of carrying out a program of rehabilitation for individuals whose earning capacity is impaired by age or physical or mental deficiency or injury or providing remunerative work for individuals who, because of their impaired physical or mental capacity, cannot be readily absorbed in the competitive labor market by an individual receiving the rehabilitation or remunerative work;

as part of an unemployment work-relief or work-training program assisted or financed in whole or in part by a federally recognized tribe or any federal agency or any agency of a state or political subdivision of the state, by an individual receiving work relief or work training;

for a state hospital by an inmate of a prison or correctional institution;

in the employ of a school, college, or university if the service is performed by a student who is enrolled and is regularly attending classes at the school, college, or university;

by an individual under the age of 22 who is enrolled at a nonprofit or public educational institution that normally maintains a regular faculty and curriculum and normally has a regularly organized body of students in attendance at the place where its educational activities are carried on as a student in a full-time program, taken for credit at the institution, that combines academic instruction with work experience if the service is an integral part of the program and the institution has so certified to the employer, except that this paragraph does not apply to service performed in a program established for or on behalf of an employer or group of employers;

in the employ of a hospital if the service is performed by a patient of the hospital, as defined in AS

23.20.520

;

in the employ of the state or a political subdivision of the state if the service is performed by an individual in the exercise of duties

as a judicial officer, the governor, the lieutenant governor, a person hired or appointed as the head or deputy head of a department in the executive branch, a person hired or appointed as the director of a division of a department in the executive branch, an assistant to the governor, a chair or member of a state commission or board, state investment officers and the state comptroller in the Department of Revenue, an appointed or elected municipal officer, any other elected official, the fiscal analyst of the legislative finance division, the legislative auditor of the legislative audit division, the executive director of the Legislative Affairs Agency, and the directors of the divisions within the Legislative Affairs Agency;

as a member of the Alaska Army National Guard or Alaska Air National Guard or Alaska Naval Militia;

as an employee serving on only a temporary basis in case of fire, storm, snow, earthquake, flood, or similar emergency; or

as an election official or election worker if the amount of remuneration received by the individual during the calendar year for services as an election official or election worker is less than $1,000;

in the employ of

a church or a convention or association of churches; or

an organization that is operated primarily for religious purposes and that is operated, supervised, controlled, or principally supported by a church or a convention or association of churches;

in the employ of a federally recognized tribe in this state if the service is performed by an individual in the exercise of duties as an officer of the federally recognized tribe and meets the requirements of 26 U.S.C. 3309(b)(3)(E) (Federal Unemployment Tax Act, Internal Revenue Code).

History.

(§ 15 ch 106 SLA 1971; am § 1 ch 55 SLA 1976; am §§ 19 — 23, 25 ch 122 SLA 1977; am § 80 ch 9 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 145 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 91 SLA 1982; am § 30 ch 115 SLA 1982; am § 14 ch 106 SLA 1984; am § 26 ch 100 SLA 1989; am § 1 ch 165 SLA 1990; am § 36 ch 127 SLA 1992; am § 3 ch 13 SLA 1993; am § 1 ch 97 SLA 1995; am § 1 ch 4 SLA 1996; am § 13 ch 63 SLA 1998; am § 11 ch 74 SLA 1998; am § 2 ch 29 SLA 1999; am § 10 ch 130 SLA 2004; am § 1 ch 32 SLA 2008; am § 18 ch 27 SLA 2009; am §§ 39, 40 ch 41 SLA 2009; am § 1 ch 8 SLA 2010; am § 15 ch 58 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

The addition of (a)(22) of this section as set out in § 1, ch. 53, SLA 1998 did not occur because the condition set out in § 3, ch. 53, SLA 1998, relating to amendment of federal law, did not occur.

The contingent amendment to this section made under sec. 33, ch. 122, SLA 1977 never took effect and was repealed by sec. 82, ch. 41, SLA 2009.

The paragraphs of subsection (a) were renumbered in 1990 to reflect the deletion of repealed paragraphs.

Paragraph (a)(20) enacted as (a)(21). Renumbered in 1993.

In 2005, in paragraph (a)(20), “AS

23.10.055

(a)(13)” was substituted for “AS

23.10.055

(13)” to reflect the addition of AS

23.10.055(b)

and (c) by § 2, ch. 90, SLA 2005.

In 2009, to reconcile the amendments made by § 18,
ch. 27, SLA 2009 and §§ 38 and 40,
ch. 41, SLA 2009, in (d) of this section a reference to “
AS

23.20.525(a)(4)

and (12)” was used instead of “
AS

23.20.525(a)(6)

and (14)”.

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and intent in connection with the amendment of (d) of this section by sec. 18, ch. 27, SLA 2009 see § 1, ch. 27, SLA 2009, in the 2009 Temporary and Special Acts.

For explanation of the amendment made to (a)(2) of this section by § 15, ch. 58, SLA 2010, see 2010 Senate Journal Supplement No. 6, July 9, 2010.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2009 amendment, effective May 26, 2009, in the introductory language of (d), substituted “AS

23.20.525(a)(6)

and (14)” for “AS

23.20.525(a)(4)

— (6) and (14)”; in (d)(3), added “a federally recognized tribe or”; added (d)(10).

The second 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, in (a)(1), substituted “AS

23.20.525(a)(13)

” for “AS 23.20.525(a)(15)”; in (a)(2), substituted “service performed by an individual under 18 years of age” for “newsboys’ services”; in (a)(3), deleted “some” preceding “24 days during the quarter”; in (a)(8), substituted “securities salesperson” for “securities salesman”; in (a)(9), substituted “AS

23.20.525(a)(9)

” for “AS

23.20.525(a)(11)

”; in (a)(11), added “United States” preceding “Secretary of Labor”; in (a)(15), substituted “AS

23.20.525(a)(14)

” for “AS 23.20.525(a)(16)”; in the introductory language in (d), substituted “AS

23.20.525(a)(4)

and (12)” for “AS

23.20.525(a)(4)

— (6) and (14)”; made stylistic changes throughout the section.

The first 2010 amendment, effective July 29, 2010, added (a)(23).

The second 2010 amendment, effective retroactively to June 21, 2009, in (a)(2), substituted “newsboys’ services” for “service performed by an individual under 18 years of age”.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 30, ch. 58, SLA 2010, makes the 2010 amendment of (a)(2) of this section retroactive to June 21, 2009.

Collateral references. —

Taxicab driver as employee of owner of cab, or independent contractor, within social security and unemployment insurance statutes. 10 ALR2d 369.

Salesman on commission as within act. 29 ALR2d 751.

What constitutes “agricultural” or “farm” labor within social security or unemployment acts. 56 ALR2d 406.

Own projects or activities, right to unemployment compensation of one working on. 65 ALR2d 1182.

Insurance agents or salesmen as within coverage of social security or unemployment compensation acts. 39 ALR3d 872.

Part-time or intermittent workers as covered by or eligible for benefits under state unemployment compensation act. 95 ALR3d 891.

Sec. 23.20.530.
Wages defined.

In this chapter, “wages” means all remuneration for service from whatever source, including insured work, noninsured work, or self-employment; commissions, bonuses, back pay, and the cash value of all remuneration in a medium other than cash shall be treated as wages; gratuities customarily received by an individual in the course of service from persons other than the individual’s employing unit may be treated as wages received from the employing unit only to the extent the individual reports the gratuities to the employing unit. The reasonable cash value of remuneration in a medium other than cash, and the reasonable amount of gratuities, shall be estimated and determined in accordance with regulations adopted by the department; notwithstanding AS

23.20.350(a)

, back pay awards shall be allocated to the weeks or quarters with respect to which the pay was earned. If the remuneration of an individual is not based on a fixed period of time or if the individual’s wages are paid in irregular intervals or in a manner that does not extend regularly over the period of employment, the wages shall be allocated to weeks or quarters in accordance with regulations adopted by the department. The regulations must, so far as possible, produce results reasonably similar to those that would prevail if the individual’s wages were paid at regular intervals. When an employer has filed for bankruptcy, unpaid wages earned for services performed for the employer are considered wages for the quarter in which they were earned.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, “wages” does not include

the amount of any payment, including an amount paid by an employing unit for insurance or annuities or into a fund to provide for the payment, to or on behalf of an individual or the individual’s dependent under a plan or system established by an employing unit that makes provisions generally for individuals performing service for it, or for such individuals generally and their dependents, or for a class or classes of the individuals and their dependents, on account of

retirement;

sickness or accident disability;

medical or hospitalization expenses in connection with sickness or accident disability; or

death;

the amount of a payment made by an employing unit to an individual performing service for it, including an amount paid by an employing unit for insurance or annuities or into a fund to provide for the payment, on account of retirement;

the amount of a payment on account of sickness or accident disability, or medical or hospitalization expenses in connection with sickness or accident disability, by an employing unit to or on behalf of an individual performing service for it after the expiration of six calendar months following the last calendar month in which the individual performed services for the employing unit;

the amount of a payment made by an employing unit to or on behalf of an individual performing services for it or the individual’s beneficiary

from or to a trust described in 26 U.S.C. 401(a) (Internal Revenue Code) that is exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. 501(a) at the time of the payment, unless the payment is made to an individual performing services for the trust as remuneration for those services and not as a beneficiary of the trust; or

under or to an annuity plan that, at the time of the payment, meets the requirements of 26 U.S.C. 401(a)(3) — (6);

the amount of a payment made by an employing unit (without deduction from the remuneration of the individual in its employ) of the tax imposed upon an individual in its employ under 26 U.S.C. 3101 (Internal Revenue Code) with respect to service performed;

remuneration paid in a medium other than cash to an individual for service not in the course of the employing unit’s trade or business;

the amount of a payment, other than vacation or sick pay, to an individual after the month in which the individual attains the age of 65, if the individual did not perform services for the employing unit in the period for which the payment is made;

dismissal payments that the employing unit is not legally required to make;

the amount of any payment, including any amount paid by an employer into a fund to provide for any such payment, made to or on behalf of an employee under a plan or system established by an employer that makes provision for the employer’s employees generally, or for a class or group of the employer’s employees, for the purpose of supplementing unemployment benefits;

the amount of a payment made to or on behalf of an employee for subsistence while the employee is employed away from home, but this exemption applies only to that portion of a subsistence payment that does not exceed the actual expenses of the employee while so employed;

compensation received for inactive service performed by a member of the Alaska National Guard or Naval Militia;

the amount of a payment made to or on behalf of an employee or the employee’s beneficiary under a cafeteria plan as defined in 26 U.S.C. 125, if the payment would not be treated as wages under this section without regard to the cafeteria plan;

the amount of payment made, or benefit furnished, by the employer under a plan to provide educational assistance to or for the benefit of an employee if, at the time of the payment or the furnishing, it is reasonable to believe that the employee will be able to exclude the payment or benefit from income under 26 U.S.C. 127(b).

History.

(§§ 242 — 249 ch 5 ESLA 1955; § 249.1 ch 5 ESLA 1955, added by § 3 ch 60 SLA 1960; § 250 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 1 ch 88 SLA 1965; am § 24 ch 122 SLA 1977; am § 78 ch 9 SLA 1980; am §§ 31 — 33 ch 115 SLA 1982; am § 27 ch 100 SLA 1989; am § 23 ch 43 SLA 1996; am § 11 ch 130 SLA 2004; am § 41 ch 41 SLA 2009; am § 20 ch 3 SLA 2017)

Revisor’s notes. —

The paragraphs in subsection (b) were renumbered in 1990 to reflect the deletion of repealed paragraphs.

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, in (b)(3), deleted “made after December 31, 1954” following “sickness or accident disability”; in (b)(5), deleted “after January 1, 1941” following “respect to service performed”; in (b)(7), deleted “made after December 31, 1954,” following “vacation or sick pay,”; in (b)(8), substituted “that” for “after January 1, 1941, which”; made stylistic changes throughout the section.

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, in (a), in the first sentence, deleted “, but not limited to,” following “from whatever source, including”; made a stylistic change.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 130, SLA 2004 (HB 490), which recommends changes to ensure that this chapter complies with federal law requirements and adds paragraph (13) to (b) of this section, see 2004 House Journal 2613 — 2614.

Sec. 23.20.535.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Alaska Employment Security Act.

History.

(§ 101 ch 5 ESLA 1955)